Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 10.2. Virginia Land Conservation Foundation.

§ 10.1-1017.
Foundation created.

There is hereby created the Virginia Land Conservation Foundation, hereinafter referred to as the Foundation, a body politic and corporate to have such powers and duties as hereinafter provided.

History.

1992, c. 426; 1999, cc. 900, 906.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 900 and 906 are identical, rewrote the former chapter head, which read: “Virginia Conservation and Recreation Foundation,” and substituted “Land Conservation” for “Conservation and Recreation.”

Law Review.

For an article, “The Rhetoric and Reality of Nature Protection:
Toward a New Discourse,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 11 (2000).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-580. Deed of Conservation Easement for Forest Lands.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality. —

Contracts with nonprofits that provide for land conservation and stewardship do not offend Va. Const., Art. IV, § 16. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Douglas W. Domenech, Secretary of Natural Resources, 11-089, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (9/13/11).

§ 10.1-1018.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Virginia Land Conservation Board of Trustees; membership; terms; vacancies; compensation and expenses.

The Foundation shall be governed and administered by a Board of Trustees. The Board shall have a total membership of 19 members that shall consist of 17 citizen members and two ex officio voting members as follows: four citizen members, who may be members of the House of Delegates, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and, if such members are members of the House of Delegates, in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; two citizen members, who may be members of the Senate, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; 11 nonlegislative citizen members, one from each congressional district, to be appointed by the Governor; and the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, or his designee, and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, or his designee, to serve ex officio with voting privileges. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for four-year terms, except that initial appointments shall be made for terms of one to four years in a manner whereby no more than six members shall have terms that expire in the same year. Legislative members and the ex officio member shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed. However, no Senate member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms, no House member shall serve more than four consecutive two-year terms and no nonlegislative citizen member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. Nonlegislative citizen members shall have experience or expertise, professional or personal, in one or more of the following areas: natural resource protection and conservation, construction and real estate development, natural habitat protection, environmental resource inventory and identification, forestry management, farming, farmland preservation, fish and wildlife management, historic preservation, and outdoor recreation. At least one of the nonlegislative citizen members shall be a farmer. Members of the Board shall post bond in the penalty of $5,000 with the State Comptroller prior to entering upon the functions of office.

The Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources shall serve as the chairman of the Board of Trustees. The chairman shall serve until his successor is appointed. The members appointed as provided in subsection A shall elect a vice-chairman annually from among the members of the Board. A majority of the members of the Board serving at any one time shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall meet at the call of the chairman or whenever a majority of the members so request.

Trustees of the Foundation shall receive no compensation for their services. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on behalf of the Foundation as provided in §§ 2.2-2813 and 2.2-2825. Funding for the costs of expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

The chairman of the Board and any other person designated by the Board to handle the funds of the Foundation shall give bond, with corporate surety, in such penalty as is fixed by the Governor, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties. The premium on the bonds shall be paid from funds available to the Foundation for such purpose.

The Board shall seek assistance in developing grant criteria and advice on grant priorities and any other appropriate issues from a task force consisting of the following agency heads or their designees: the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the State Forester, the Director of the Department of Historic Resources, the Director of the Department of Wildlife Resources and the Executive Director of the Virginia Outdoors Foundation. The Board may request any other agency head to serve on or appoint a designee to serve on the task force.

History.

1992, c. 426; 1999, cc. 900, 906; 2000, cc. 21, 294, 494, 1053; 2003, c. 885; 2005, cc. 633, 758; 2006, c. 45; 2020, c. 958; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 1053, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect current members of the Virginia Land Conservation Board of Trustees whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2000.”

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 7, provides: “That all current members of the collegial bodies whose terms have been modified by this act shall be eligible, if reappointed, to the full number of terms provided by this act regardless of prior service.”

Acts 2005, c. 758, cl. 2, provides:
“That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments, made by the Senate Committee on Privileges and Elections, for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments made after July 1, 2005 shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 900 and 906 are identical, and in subsection A, in the third sentence, substituted “conservation” for “conservancy” and inserted “farming, farmland preservation,” and in the seventh sentence, substituted “their designees” for “his designee.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 21 and 294 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted the “State Treasurer, or his designee” following “Secretary of Natural Resources,” and substituted “eight” for “seven,” substituted “Four” for “Three” in the second sentence, and in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “terms” for “term,” deleted “and the State Treasurer,” following “Secretry of Natural Resources,” and substituted “his designee” for “their designees”; and in subsection D, deleted “the State Treasurer or his designee and” following “composed of,” and substituted “seven” for “six.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 494 inserted the present fifth sentence in subsection A.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1053 rewrote the section. See Editor’s note.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 rewrote subsection A, deleted the former first and second sentences of subsection B, which read: “The Secretary of Natural Resources or his designee shall also serve on the Board of Trustees. The term of the Secretary of Natural Resources or his designee shall be coincident with that of the Governor,” and added “or whenever a majority of the members so request” at the end of the last sentence of subsection B; rewrote subsection C; and added subsection F.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 633 deleted former subsection F, which read: “The chairman of the Board shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a biennial executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Board no later than the first day of each even-numbered year regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislature Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

The 2005 amendment by c. 758, in subsection A, substituted “have a total membership of 18 members that shall consist of” for “consist of 18 members that include” and “Rules” for “Privileges and Elections” in the second sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 45, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “19” for “18,” “two ex officio voting members” for “one ex officio voting member” and inserted “and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, or his designee.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection E, first sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subsections A and B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 705, added “and at least one shall be a member of a state-recognized or federally recognized Virginia Indian Tribe.” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A.

§ 10.1-1018.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Virginia Land Conservation Board of Trustees; membership; terms; vacancies; compensation and expenses.

The Foundation shall be governed and administered by a Board of Trustees. The Board shall have a total membership of 19 members that shall consist of 17 citizen members and two ex officio voting members as follows: four citizen members, who may be members of the House of Delegates, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and, if such members are members of the House of Delegates, in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; two citizen members, who may be members of the Senate, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; 11 nonlegislative citizen members, one from each congressional district, to be appointed by the Governor; and the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, or his designee, and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, or his designee, to serve ex officio with voting privileges. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for four-year terms, except that initial appointments shall be made for terms of one to four years in a manner whereby no more than six members shall have terms that expire in the same year. Legislative members and the ex officio member shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed. However, no Senate member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms, no House member shall serve more than four consecutive two-year terms and no nonlegislative citizen member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. Nonlegislative citizen members shall have experience or expertise, professional or personal, in one or more of the following areas: natural resource protection and conservation, construction and real estate development, natural habitat protection, environmental resource inventory and identification, forestry management, farming, farmland preservation, fish and wildlife management, historic preservation, and outdoor recreation. At least one of the nonlegislative citizen members shall be a farmer, and at least one shall be a member of a state-recognized or federally recognized Virginia Indian Tribe. Members of the Board shall post bond in the penalty of $5,000 with the State Comptroller prior to entering upon the functions of office.

The Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources shall serve as the chairman of the Board of Trustees. The chairman shall serve until his successor is appointed. The members appointed as provided in subsection A shall elect a vice-chairman annually from among the members of the Board. A majority of the members of the Board serving at any one time shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall meet at the call of the chairman or whenever a majority of the members so request.

Trustees of the Foundation shall receive no compensation for their services. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on behalf of the Foundation as provided in §§ 2.2-2813 and 2.2-2825. Funding for the costs of expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

The chairman of the Board and any other person designated by the Board to handle the funds of the Foundation shall give bond, with corporate surety, in such penalty as is fixed by the Governor, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties. The premium on the bonds shall be paid from funds available to the Foundation for such purpose.

The Board shall seek assistance in developing grant criteria and advice on grant priorities and any other appropriate issues from a task force consisting of the following agency heads or their designees: the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the State Forester, the Director of the Department of Historic Resources, the Director of the Department of Wildlife Resources and the Executive Director of the Virginia Outdoors Foundation. The Board may request any other agency head to serve on or appoint a designee to serve on the task force.

History.

1992, c. 426; 1999, cc. 900, 906; 2000, cc. 21, 294, 494, 1053; 2003, c. 885; 2005, cc. 633, 758; 2006, c. 45; 2020, c. 958; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401; 2022, c. 705.

§ 10.1-1018.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Reporting.

The chairman of the Board shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly, including the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and to the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget an executive summary and report of the interim activity and work of the Board on or before December 15 of each even-numbered year. The document shall report on the status of the Foundation and its Fund, including (i) land conservation targeting tools developed for the Foundation; (ii) descriptions of projects that received funding; (iii) a description of the geographic distribution of land protected as provided in §

10.1-1021.1

; (iv) expenditures from, interest earned by, and financial obligations of the Fund; and (v) progress made toward recognized state and regional land conservation goals, including what percentage of properties conserved were identified by ConserveVirginia, pursuant to §

10.1-104.6:1

, and whether the identified conservation values were protected. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2005, c. 633; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 99.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 99, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “but not limited to” preceding clause (i); deleted former clause (i), which read “implementation of its strategic plan” and redesignated remaining clauses accordingly; and in clause (v), inserted “including what percentage of properties conserved were identified by ConserveVirginia, pursuant to §

10.1-104.6:1

, and whether the identified conservation values were protected.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 705, in the first sentence, deleted “interim” preceding “activity” and deleted “even-numbered” preceding “year”; substituted “and a summary of the conservation values that were protected.” for “and whether the identified conservation values were protected.”; and added the next-to-last sentence.

§ 10.1-1018.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Reporting.

The chairman of the Board shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly, including the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and to the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget an executive summary and report of the activity and work of the Board on or before December 15 of each year. The document shall report on the status of the Foundation and its Fund, including (i) land conservation targeting tools developed for the Foundation; (ii) descriptions of projects that received funding; (iii) a description of the geographic distribution of land protected as provided in §

10.1-1021.1

; (iv) expenditures from, interest earned by, and financial obligations of the Fund; and (v) progress made toward recognized state and regional land conservation goals, including what percentage of properties conserved were identified by ConserveVirginia, pursuant to §

10.1-104.6:1

, and a summary of the conservation values that were protected. The report shall also estimate the funds needed to achieve goals established by the Board for (a) natural area protection, (b) open spaces and parks, (c) farmland preservation, (d) forest land preservation, (e) historical and cultural sites, (f) meeting the needs of under-resourced communities, and (g) any other goal determined by the Board. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2005, c. 633; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 99; 2022, c. 705.

§ 10.1-1019.
Executive secretary; land management.

The Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall serve as executive secretary to the Foundation and shall be responsible for providing technical assistance and performing any administrative duties that the Foundation may direct.

The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall administer the Foundation’s lands as if such lands were departmental lands, and the regulations established by the Director for the management and protection of departmental lands shall apply to real estate held by the Foundation. The Department’s conservation officers commissioned under §

10.1-115

shall have jurisdiction on all of the Foundation’s lands and waters.

History.

1992, c. 426; 2000, c. 1053.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 1053, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect current members of the Virginia Land Conservation Board of Trustees whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2000.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1053 designated the first paragraph as subsection A, substituted “providing technical assistance and performing any” for “the performance of the” in subsection A, and added subsection B.

§ 10.1-1020.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Virginia Land Conservation Fund; purposes of Foundation.

The Foundation shall establish, administer, manage, including the creation of reserves, and make expenditures and allocations from a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Virginia Land Conservation Fund, hereinafter referred to as the Fund. The Foundation shall establish and administer the Fund solely for the purposes of:

Acquiring fee simple title or other rights, including the purchase of development rights, to interests or privileges in property for the protection or preservation of ecological, cultural or historical resources, lands for recreational purposes, state forest lands, and lands for threatened or endangered species, fish and wildlife habitat, natural areas, agricultural and forestal lands and open space; and

Providing grants to state agencies, including the Virginia Outdoors Foundation, and matching grants to other public bodies and holders for acquiring fee simple title or other rights, including the purchase of development rights, to interests or privileges in real property for the protection or preservation of ecological, cultural or historical resources, lands for recreational purposes, and lands for threatened or endangered species, fish and wildlife habitat, natural areas, agricultural and forestal lands and open space. The Board shall establish criteria for making grants from the Fund, including procedures for determining the amount of each grant and the required match. The criteria shall include provisions for grants to localities for purchase of development rights programs.Interests in land acquired as provided in subdivision 1 of this subsection may be held by the Foundation or transferred to state agencies or other appropriate holders. Whenever a holder acquires any interest in land other than a fee simple interest as a result of a grant or transfer from the Foundation, such interest shall be held jointly by the holder and a public body. Whenever a holder acquires a fee simple interest in land as a result of a grant or transfer from the Foundation, a public body shall hold an open space easement in such land.

The Fund shall consist of general fund moneys and gifts, endowments or grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and funds from any other available sources, public or private. Such moneys, gifts, endowments, grants or funds from other sources may be either restricted or unrestricted. For the purposes of this chapter, “restricted funds” shall mean those funds received by the Board to which specific conditions apply; “restricted funds” shall include, but not be limited to, general obligation bond moneys and conditional gifts. “Unrestricted funds” shall mean those received by the Foundation to which no specific conditions apply; “unrestricted funds” shall include, but not be limited to, moneys appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly to which no specific conditions are attached and unconditional gifts.Beginning July 1, 2019, the Foundation shall conduct a grant round each year to identify and rank projects for the subsequent fiscal year. Biennially in the odd-numbered years, the Foundation shall assume an amount of funding of the grant program as provided in the general appropriation act. Biennially in the even-numbered years, the Foundation shall assume the most recent amount of funding of the grant program as specified in the most recently enacted general appropriation act. On or before December 15 of each year, the chairman of the Board of Trustees shall provide copies of such project rankings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. At the beginning of each fiscal year, the Foundation shall finalize grant awards based on the funded level appropriated for that year, as provided in subsections C and D. Any ranked project that does not receive a proposed grant as a result of an insufficiency in appropriated funds shall be eligible to participate in a subsequent grant round.

In any fiscal year for which the Fund is appropriated less than $10 million, and after an allocation for administrative expenses has been made as provided in subsection G, the remaining unrestricted funds in the Fund shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty-five percent shall be transferred to the Virginia Outdoors Foundation’s Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund to be used as provided in §

10.1-1801.1

; and

Seventy-five percent shall be divided equally among the following four grant uses: (i) natural area protection; (ii) open spaces and parks, including but not limited to, land for public hunting, fishing or wildlife watching; (iii) farmlands and forest preservation; and (iv) historic area preservation. Of the amount allocated as provided in this subdivision, at least one third shall be used to secure easements to be held or co-held by a public body.

In any fiscal year for which the Fund is appropriated $10 million or more, and after an allocation for administrative expenses has been made as provided in subsection G, the remaining unrestricted funds in the Fund shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty-five percent shall be transferred to the Virginia Outdoors Foundation’s Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund to be used as provided in §

10.1-1801.1

; and

The remaining funds shall be divided equally among the following five grant uses: (i) natural area protection; (ii) open spaces and parks, including but not limited to, land for public hunting, fishing, or wildlife watching; (iii) farmland preservation; (iv) forestland conservation; and (v) historic area preservation.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall remain in the Fund, and shall not revert to the general fund. Interest earned on moneys received by the Fund other than bond proceeds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any funds transferred to the Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust Fund pursuant to this section and not disbursed or committed to a project by the end of the fiscal year in which the funds were transferred shall be returned to the Virginia Land Conservation Fund and shall be redistributed among the authorized grant uses during the next grant cycle.

A portion of the Fund, not to exceed twenty percent of the annual balance of unrestricted funds, may be used to develop properties purchased in fee simple, or through the purchase of development rights, with the assets of the Fund for public use including, but not limited to, development of trails, parking areas, infrastructure, and interpretive projects or to conduct environmental assessments or other preliminary evaluations of properties prior to the acquisition of any property interest.

Up to $250,000 per year of the interest generated by the Fund may be used for the Foundation’s administrative expenses, including, but not limited to, the expenses of the Board and its members, development of the Foundation’s strategic plan, development and maintenance of an inventory of properties as provided in subdivision 1 b of §

10.1-1021

, development of a needs assessment for future expenditures as provided in subdivision 1 c of §

10.1-1021

, and fulfillment of reporting requirements. All such expenditures shall be subject to approval by the Board of Trustees.

The Comptroller shall maintain the restricted funds and the unrestricted funds in separate accounts.

For the purposes of this section, “public body” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in §

10.1-1700

, and “holder” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in §

10.1-1009

.

History.

1992, c. 426; 1999, cc. 900, 906; 2000, cc. 494, 1053; 2006, c. 227; 2007, cc. 77, 673; 2019, c. 539.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 1053, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect current members of the Virginia Land Conservation Board of Trustees whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2000.”

Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, as amended by Acts 2019, c. 854, Item 363 A 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “Included in the amounts for Preservation of Open Space Lands is $4,500,000 the second year from the general fund to be deposited into the Virginia Land Conservation Fund, §

10.1-1020

, Code of Virginia. No less than 50 percent of the appropriations remaining after the transfer to the Virginia Outdoors Foundation’s Open-Space Lands Preservation Trust fund has been satisfied are to be used for grants for fee simple acquisitions with public access or acquisitions of easements with public access. This appropriation shall be deemed sufficient to meet the provisions of § 2.2-1509.4, Code of Virginia.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” in the second paragraph of subsection B. March 10, 2021.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 900 and 906 are identical, and redesignated former subsection A as present subsection A and subdivision 1; in subsection A, substituted “Land Conservation” for “Conservation and Recreation,” and substituted “purposes of” for “purpose of purchasing” at the end of said subsection, in subdivision 1, added “Purchasing” at the beginning of the subdivision, and substituted “agricultural and forestal lands and open space; and” for “and open space” at the end of said subdivision, added subdivision 2, added present subsection C, and redesignated former subsections C, D, and E as present D, E, and F, respectively.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 494 added the last two sentences to the end of subdivision A 2.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1053 substituted “Acquiring” for “Purchasing” in subdivision A 1; in subdivision A 2, substituted “Providing grants to state agencies, including the Virginia Outdoors Foundation, and matching grants to other public bodies and holders for acquiring fee simple title” for “Providing matching grants to holders as defined in §

10.1-1009

and public bodies as defined in §

10.1-1700

for purchasing fee simple title”; added the second paragraph of subsection A; rewrote subsection C, which read: “All unrestricted funds in the Fund shall be allocated as follows: (i) twenty-five percent to natural area protection; (ii) twenty-five percent to open spaces and parks; (iii) twenty-five percent to farmlands and forest preservation; and (iv) twenty-five percent to historic area preservation”; added present subsection F; redesignated former subsection F as subsection G, and in subsection G, substituted “Comptroller” for “State treasurer”; and added present subsection H.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 227, in subdivisions A 1 and A 2, deleted “to” following “title” and inserted “including the purchase of development rights, to”; and inserted “or through the purchase of development rights” in subsection E.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 77 and 673 are identical, and in the introductory paragraph of subsection C, inserted “In any year in which the Fund contains less than $10 million in new deposits on September 1, and” and substituted “subsection G” for “subsection F”; inserted “Virginia Outdoors Foundation’s” in subdivision C 1; in the first sentence of subdivision C 2, inserted “grant” preceding “uses” and inserted “including but not limited to” at the end of clause (ii); added subsection D; redesignated former subsections D through H as present subsections E through I; and added the last sentence in subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 539 added the second paragraph in subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “In any fiscal year for which the Fund is appropriated less than $10 million, and” for “In any year in which the Fund contains less than $10 million in new deposits on September 1, and”; and in subsection D, substituted “In any fiscal year for which the Fund is appropriated $10 million or more, and” for “In any year in which the Fund contains $10 million or more in new deposits on September 1, and.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 705, inserted “and for conservation and restoration of homelands for state-recognized and federal recognized Virginia Indian Tribes” in subdivision A 1; inserted “and state-recognized and federally recognized Virginia Indian Tribes” in the first paragraph of subdivision A 2; in the second paragraph of subdivision A 2, in the first sentence, deleted “of this subsection” following “subdivision 1”, deleted “or transferred to” following “Foundation”, and substituted “state agencies, state-recognized or federally recognized Virginia Indian Tribes, other public bodies, and appropriate holders.” for “state agencies or, other appropriate holders.”; deleted the second paragraph of subsection B, which read: “Beginning July 1, 2019, the Foundation shall conduct a grant round each year to identify and rank projects for the subsequent fiscal year. Biennially in the odd-numbered years, the Foundation shall assume an amount of funding of the grant program as provided in the general appropriation act. Biennially in the even-numbered years, the Foundation shall assume the most recent amount of funding of the grant program as specified in the most recently enacted general appropriation act. On or before December 15 of each year, the chairman of the Board of Trustees shall provide copies of such project rankings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. At the beginning of each fiscal year, the Foundation shall finalize grant awards based on the funded level appropriated for that year, as provided in subsections C and D. Any ranked project that does not receive a proposed grant as a result of an insufficiency in appropriated funds shall be eligible to participate in a subsequent grant round.”; substituted “20 percent” for “twenty percent” in subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality. —

Virginia Const., Art. IV, § 16, which prohibits appropriations to charitable institutions not owned or controlled by the Commonwealth, applies to nonprofits that are devoted to land conservation. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Douglas W. Domenech, Secretary of Natural Resources, 11-089, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (9/13/11).

While the General Assembly cannot make appropriations in the nature of gifts to nonprofits engaged in land conservation, it can sign contracts or leases with such entities. A contract involves a bargained for exchange and mutual accountability. A grant that is in the nature of a gift does not satisfy constitutional requirements under Va. Const., Art. IV, § 16. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Douglas W. Domenech, Secretary of Natural Resources, 11-089, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (9/13/11).

Contracts with nonprofits that provide for land conservation and stewardship do not offend Va. Const., Art. IV, § 16. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Douglas W. Domenech, Secretary of Natural Resources, 11-089, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (9/13/11).

Conservation easements. —

A conservation easement obtained under the Virginia Conservation Easement Act (§

10.1-1009

et seq.) or the Open-Space Land Act (§

10.1-1700

et seq.) is not extinguished by application of the common-law doctrine of merger of estates when the easement holder acquires fee simple title to the encumbered land. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas Davis Rust, Member, House of Delegates, 11-140, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 31 (8/31/2012).